Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 7. Bicycles and Electric Bicycles

§ 31-5-701.
Prohibited acts.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required in W.S.

31-5-701

through

31-5-706

.

The parent of any child and the guardian of any ward shall not authorize or knowingly permit the child or ward to violate any provision of this act.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 74; C.S. 1945, § 60-674; W.S. 1957, § 31-164; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-702.
General rights and duties of riders.

Every person propelling a vehicle by human power or riding a bicycle or electric bicycle has all of the rights and all of the duties applicable to the driver of any vehicle under this act, except as to special regulations in this act and except as to those provisions which by their nature can have no application.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 75; C.S. 1945, § 60-675; W.S. 1957, § 31-165; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2019 ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added “or electric bicycle.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Applied

in

Blakeman v. Gopp, 364 P.2d 986,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1961).

Cited

in

Hodges v. State, 904 P.2d 334,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of evidence to raise last clear chance doctrine in cases of automobile collision with pedestrian or bicyclist—modern cases, 9 ALR5th 826.

§ 31-5-703.
Number of riders.

No bicycle shall be used to carry more persons at one (1) time than the number for which it is designed or equipped except that an adult rider may carry a child securely attached to his person in a backpack or sling.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 76; C.S. 1945, § 60-676; W.S. 1957, § 31-166; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-704.
Riding on roadways and designated paths.

Every person operating a bicycle upon a roadway shall ride as near to the right side of the roadway as practicable exercising due care when passing a standing vehicle or one proceeding in the same direction.

Persons riding bicycles upon a roadway shall not ride more than two (2) abreast except on paths or parts of roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles. Persons riding two (2) abreast shall not impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic and, on a laned roadway, shall ride within a single lane.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 112, § 1.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 78; C.S. 1945, § 60-678; W.S. 1957, § 31-167; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 112, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective February 23, 2007, repealed former (c), which read: “Whenever a usable path for bicycles has been provided adjacent to a roadway, bicycle riders shall use the path and shall not use the roadway.”

Laws 2007, ch. 112, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

Motorist may not rely on bicyclist staying specific distance from edge of road. —

The driver of a motor vehicle approaching a bicyclist from behind without warning may not rely on the bicycle remaining at a specific distance from the edge of the road. Blakeman v. Gopp, 364 P.2d 986,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1961).

Cited

in

Hodges v. State, 904 P.2d 334,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 31-5-705.
Carrying articles.

No person operating a bicycle shall carry any package, bundle or article which prevents the use of both hands in the control and operation of the bicycle. A person operating a bicycle shall keep at least one (1) hand upon the handle bars at all times.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 79; C.S. 1945, § 60-679; W.S. 1957, § 31-168; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-706.
Lamps and other equipment.

Every bicycle when in use at nighttime shall be equipped with a lamp on the front which shall emit a white light visible from a distance of at least five hundred (500) feet to the front and with a red reflector on the rear of a type approved by the highway department which shall be visible from six hundred (600) feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle. A lamp emitting a red light visible from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the rear may be used in addition to the red reflector.

A bicycle shall not be equipped with nor shall any person use upon a bicycle any siren or whistle.

Every bicycle shall be equipped with a brake which will enable the operator to stop the bicycle within twenty-five (25) feet from a speed of ten (10) miles per hour on dry, level, clean pavement.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 80; C.S. 1945, § 60-680; W.S. 1957, § 31-169; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-707.
Electric bicycles.

The operator of an electric bicycle is subject to W.S.

31-5-702

and is not subject to the provisions of this title relating to financial responsibility, driver’s licenses, registration, certificates of title or off-road recreational vehicles. An electric bicycle shall not be a motor vehicle.

On and after January 1, 2020, every manufacturer or distributor of an electric bicycle shall ensure that a label is permanently affixed in a prominent location on each electric bicycle sold or distributed by the manufacturer or distributor. The label shall indicate the class number as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxxiv), the top assisted speed and motor wattage of the electric bicycle and shall be printed in at least nine (9) point font.

A person shall not modify an electric bicycle to change the motor-powered speed capability or motor engagement of the electric bicycle, unless the person replaces the label required in subsection (b) of this section indicating the classification.

An electric bicycle shall comply with United States consumer product safety commission equipment and manufacturing requirements for bicycles, 16 C.F.R. 1512.

An electric bicycle shall operate according to class so that when the rider stops pedaling, applies the brakes or the electric motor is disengaged, the electric motor assist ceases to function.

A local authority or state agency with jurisdiction may regulate the use of any class of electric bicycles on trails, including nonmotorized trails, under its jurisdiction. For purposes of this paragraph, “nonmotorized trail” means a trail with a natural surface made by clearing and grading the native soil with no added surfacing materials.

History.

2019 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 95, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.